Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201885-1429
Commission; report on higher education priorities.

On or before March 15 of each year, the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education shall provide electronically to the Legislature a report that evaluates progress toward attainment of the priorities listed in subdivision (3) of section 85-1428.

Laws 2006, LB 962, § 8;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 239;

Laws 2015, LB99, § 1.